Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 35. Right-of-Way Leasing Act.
Sec. 38.35.121.
Covenants required to be in a lease to a natural gas pipeline that is a contract carrier.

For a lease of state land for a right-of-way for which an applicant has applied as a contract carrier under AS 42.08, a noncompetitive lease of state land for a right-of-way for a natural gas pipeline valued at $1,000,000 or more may be granted only on the condition that the lessee expressly covenant in the lease, in consideration of the rights acquired by it under the lease, that

except for the covenants in AS

38.35.120

(a)(1), (2), and (5), it will meet the requirements of AS

38.35.120

;

it will interchange natural gas and provide connections with each public utility pipeline, common carrier pipeline, or contract carrier pipeline, and facilities for the interchange of natural gas at every locality reached by both pipelines when the necessity exists, as provided in contracts on file with the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

it assumes the status of and will perform all of its functions undertaken under the lease as a contract carrier and, subject to contracts with shippers, will accept, convey, and transport, without discrimination, natural gas delivered to it for transportation from fields in the vicinity of the pipeline subject to the right-of-way lease throughout the pipeline route, both on state land obtained under the lease and on other land, and that, subject to contracts with shippers, it will accept, convey, and transport natural gas without unjust or unreasonable discrimination in favor of itself or one producer or person against another, but will take the natural gas delivered or offered without unreasonable discrimination;

it will expand the natural gas pipeline on commercially reasonable terms that, when possible, encourage exploration and development of gas resources in this state without increasing transportation costs for a shipper except as provided for in the contract with the shipper; in this paragraph, “commercially reasonable terms” means terms that produce sufficient revenue from transportation contracts to cover the cost of the expansion, including increased fuel costs and a reasonable return on capital, without impairing the ability of the pipeline to recover the costs of existing facilities;

it will not require a shipper to pay a rate in excess of the rates provided for in the contract with that shipper.

A contract carrier may offer to a shipper firm transportation service, interruptible transportation service, or both. In this subsection, “firm transportation service” has the meaning given in AS

42.08.900

.

The lessee may not construct or expand or allow the construction or expansion of a natural gas pipeline under (a) of this section to be a competing natural gas pipeline project for purposes of AS 43.90. In this subsection, “competing natural gas pipeline project” has the meaning given in AS

43.90.440

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 27, ch. 11, SLA 2013 makes this section effective May 22, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 38.35.122.
Products pipeline leases.

The commissioner has discretion to include any or all of the terms set out in AS

38.35.120

in leases of state land for products pipeline right-of-way purposes.

History.

(§ 11 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 38.35.120(f). Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.35.130.
Right-of-way easements or leases acquired from others.

The lessee may, if the commissioner delegates the function to it, condemn, by declaration of taking, under AS

09.55.420

—

09.55.450

, real property and acquire leases of or easements or rights-of-way on land in the state required for right-of-way purposes for a pipeline subject to the lease on behalf of and as agent for the state in which title to or interest in the land shall vest.

The lease shall contain a covenant that the land, right-of-way, or easement acquired under this section is or will form part of the land leased to the lessee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 12 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 38.35.140.
Payment of rental and costs.

The lease price for a right-of-way lease shall be the annual fair market rental of the state land included in the right-of-way based on the appraised fair market value of the land. The lease price is payable annually in advance on or before the anniversary of the lease. The appraised fair market rental value shall be adjusted at five-year intervals and charges or adjustments shall be based on a reappraised annual rental value. Rental may not be charged for any land acquired by the lessee under AS

38.35.130(b)

and conveyed without cost to the state.

The lease applicant or lessee shall reimburse the state for all reasonable costs incurred in processing an application filed under AS

38.35.050

and in monitoring the construction, operation, maintenance, and termination of the pipeline on the right-of-way. The commissioner shall use best efforts to reach agreement with the lessee addressing the details of cost reimbursement under this subsection and shall provide the lessee with an annual estimate of the projected costs and scope of the work.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a right-of-way lease shall be granted without appraisal or rental costs to the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation created under AS

31.25.010

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 16 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 67 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 56 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 51 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 2001; am § 12 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, added (c).

Sec. 38.35.145.
Agreement to provide for payment of preapplication costs.

To accommodate preliminary work in advance of the receipt of an application for a lease under this chapter, the department may enter into an agreement with a prospective lessee desiring to own an oil or natural gas pipeline that is proposed to be located in whole or in part on state land. The agreement must provide that the prospective lessee reimburse the department for the reasonable costs of work incurred in preparing for activities before receipt of an application.

Expenditure of amounts received by the department under (a) of this section is subject to appropriation by the legislature. Appropriations made to satisfy the requirement of (a) of this section may be made by general appropriations of program receipts conditioned on compliance with the program review provisions of AS

37.07.080(h)

.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 21 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 76 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2004)

Sec. 38.35.150.
Additional provisions of lease. [Repealed, § 14 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

Sec. 38.35.160.
Transfer of right-of-way lease, certificates, or pipeline. [Repealed, § 15 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

Sec. 38.35.170.
Forfeiture of lease.

Failure to begin construction of the pipeline facility within a reasonable time of the granting of a right-of-way lease under this chapter for reasons within the control of the lessee or failure of an owner of an interest in the granted right-of-way substantially to comply with the terms of the right-of-way shall be grounds for forfeiture of the right-of-way interest of the lessee or owner in an action brought by the commissioner in the superior court. Before the commencement of any action for forfeiture of an interest in a right-of-way under this section, the commissioner shall give the lessee or owner of the interest notice in writing of the alleged default and shall not commence the proceeding unless the lessee or owner of the interest has failed to initiate good faith efforts to cure the default within 60 days of the notice of the alleged default.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 38.35.180.
Suits to enjoin or recover damages for defaults.

When in the judgment of the commissioner a person has violated or is about to violate a provision of this chapter or an obligation, condition, or provision of a right-of-way lease, the attorney general, on advice of the commissioner, shall seek a prohibition or mandatory injunction from the superior court to remedy the violation.

A penalty imposed by the provisions of a right-of-way lease issued under this chapter may be enforced in the superior court by proceedings in personam against the lessee carrier, or, in the case of a lien, by proceedings in rem against any of the lessee carrier’s property.

Neither this section nor the state’s obtaining an injunction or recovering penalties extinguishes any civil cause of action arising out of a violation of this chapter or the provisions of a right-of-way lease.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 17 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 38.35.190.
Application of the Administrative Procedure Act.

AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

,

44.62.640

, and

44.62.950

apply to regulations adopted by the commissioner under the authority of this chapter.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 18 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 9 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, “AS

44.62.950

” was substituted for “AS

44.62.650

” in subsection (a) to reflect the 1998 renumbering of AS

44.62.650

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

” at the beginning.

Sec. 38.35.200.
Judicial review.

An applicant or competing applicant or a person who has a direct financial interest affected by the lease who raises objections within 60 days of the publication of notice under AS

38.35.070

are the only persons with standing to seek judicial review of a decision of the commissioner under AS

38.35.100

.

The only grounds for judicial review of a decision of the commissioner are

failure to follow the procedures set out in this chapter; or

abuse of discretion so capricious, arbitrary, or confiscatory as to constitute a denial of due process.

Except as provided for an applicant in (a) of this section and notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, an action or decision of the commissioner or other state officer or agency concerning the issuance or approval of a necessary right-of-way, permit, lease, certificate, license, or other authorization for the planning, financing, acquisition, maintenance, development, construction, or initial operation of a natural gas pipeline by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation under AS 31.25 that uses a right-of-way subject to this chapter may not be subject to judicial review, except that a claim alleging the invalidity of this subsection must be brought within 60 days after May 22, 2013, and a claim alleging that an action will deny rights under the Constitution of the State of Alaska must be brought within 60 days following the date of that action. A claim that is not filed within the limitations established in this subsection is barred. A complaint under this subsection must be filed in superior court, and the superior court has exclusive jurisdiction. Notwithstanding AS

22.10.020(c)

, except in conjunction with a final judgment on a claim filed under this subsection, the superior court may not grant injunctive relief, including a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, permanent injunction, or stay, against the issuance of a necessary right-of-way, permit, lease, certificate, license, or other authorization for the planning, financing, acquisition, maintenance, development, construction, or initial operation of a natural gas pipeline by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation. In this subsection, “natural gas pipeline” has the meaning given in AS

38.34.099

.

An appeal of a permitting decision or authorization by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS 46.03 or AS 46.14 that is made under a program approved or delegated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency is not

subject to the limitation in (a) of this section;

included in the actions or decisions described in (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 19 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 13 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 38.35.205.
Lease savings clause.

A judicial finding that any term or condition of a right-of-way lease issued under this chapter is unlawful or invalid may not operate to invalidate the lease or any other term or condition of the lease.

History.

(§ 23 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 38.35.210.
Delegation of commissioner’s authority.

The commissioner may delegate to an employee of the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Law the authority granted under this chapter, except for the authority to execute leases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 20 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.220.
Continued operation of certain carriers.

Natural gas carriers that operate as public utilities holding easements, rights-of-way, or permits for pipelines on state public land on May 20, 1972, are unaffected by this chapter within the scope of their existing operations, normal expansions, and extensions thereof so long as their original or present purpose and function remains unchanged. This exemption does not apply to a natural gas pipeline constructed outside of the

Southcentral region of the state;

Matanuska-Susitna Borough;

Kenai Peninsula Borough;

Municipality of Anchorage;

Chugach Regional Educational Attendance Area; or

Copper River Regional Educational Attendance Area.

Subject to (a) of this section, if an existing right-of-way is revocable or for a term of years, then upon revocation or expiration this chapter applies.

Applications for pipeline permits which have been filed with the division of lands before May 20, 1972, shall be considered as filed under this chapter but this does not otherwise restrict the authority of the commissioner in acting on these applications under this chapter; however, if the division of lands has, before May 20, 1972, granted right-of-entry to an applicant or issued a letter of no-objection to an applicant, and the applicant thereafter fully complies with all of the terms and conditions originally specified by the division of lands or other agency, these applications are existing valid permits or easements on May 20, 1972.

[Repealed by § 21 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 21 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 5 ch 7 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For division of lands, see AS

38.05.005

.

Sec. 38.35.225.
Binding effect of covenants.

By entering into a lease under this chapter, the lessee is bound by all the covenants provided for in the lease to the full extent of the power of the state to impose those covenants under its authority as owner of the land to be leased or under its police or regulatory powers or otherwise; provided that the right of the lessee to challenge the power of the state to require such a covenant as owner of the land to be leased or under its police or regulatory powers or otherwise is preserved until such time as action to enforce the covenant is taken by the state.

History.

(§ 23 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 38.35.230.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“coordinate agencies” includes Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, Department of Environmental Conservation, and the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

“lease” means the instrument or extension of an instrument issued under this chapter granting a leasehold interest in state land for pipeline right-of-way purposes to a person and authorizing the construction or operation of, or transportation, service or sale by a pipeline for crude oil, natural gas, or products;

“lessee” means a person or persons holding a valid lease issued by the commissioner;

“natural gas” includes all hydrocarbons produced at the wellhead not defined as oil;

“oil” includes crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity which are produced at the wellhead in liquid form and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas, other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas;

“pipeline” or “pipeline facility” means all the facilities of a total system of pipe, whether owned or operated under a contract, agreement, or lease, used by a carrier for transportation of crude oil, natural gas, or products for delivery, for storage, or for further transportation, and including all pipe, pump or compressor stations, station equipment, tanks, valves, access roads, bridges, airfields, terminals and terminal facilities, including docks and tanker loading facilities, operations control center for both the upstream part of the pipeline and the terminal, tanker ballast treatment facilities, and fire protection system, communication system, and all other facilities used or necessary for an integral line of pipe, taken as a whole, to effectuate transportation, including an extension or enlargement of the line;

“product” means refined crude oil, crude tops, topped crude, processed crude petroleum, residue from crude petroleum, cracking stock, uncracked fuel oil, fuel oil, treated crude oil, residuum, gas oil, casinghead gasoline, natural gas gasoline, naphtha, distillate, gasoline, kerosene, benzine, wash oil, waste oil, blended gasoline, lubricating oil, blends or mixtures of petroleum and any liquid product or by-product derived from crude petroleum oil or natural gas;

“state land” means

“state land” as defined in AS

38.05.965

;

public land of the United States selected by the state under sec. 6 of the Alaska Statehood Act of 1958 (P.L. 85-508; 72 Stat. 339), as amended, and real property of the United States transferred to the state under secs. 21, 35, and 45 of the Alaska Omnibus Act of 1959 (P.L. 86-70; 73 Stat. 141), as amended;

any interest owned by the state in land if the interest is sufficient to permit the state to lease it under the authority of this chapter;

“transportation” means the shipment or carriage by a pipeline of crude oil, natural gas, or products from an upstream terminus in one or more fields or points of production or supply of the minerals to a downstream terminus in one or more points for delivery of the minerals to a purchaser or consignee, for storage, or for further carriage or shipment, including shipment or carriage within the state that may be classified as interstate or foreign transportation to the extent that the transportation may constitutionally be subjected to the provisions of this chapter, as well as all services necessary to effectuate shipment or carriage, including, among other things, the receipt, storage, processing, handling, transfer in transit, forwarding, and delivery of the minerals.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am E.O. No. 39, § 11 (1977); am § 70 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 18 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in paragraph (2) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999. In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.260.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Right-of-Way Leasing Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 47 ch 53 SLA 1973)